Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-1001
Legislative findings; purpose of sections.

(1) The Legislature finds that recurrent flooding in various areas of the state presents serious hazards to the health, safety, welfare, and property of the people of the state, both within and outside such areas. The hazards include loss of life, loss of and damage to private and public property, disruption of lives and of livelihoods, interruption of commerce, transportation, communication, and governmental services, and unsanitary and unhealthy living and environmental conditions. The wise use of land subject to flooding is a matter of state concern. The Legislature further finds that the establishment of improved flood plain management practices and the availability of financial assistance to citizens of the state whose property is damaged during times of flooding are essential to the health, safety, and general welfare of the people of Nebraska.

(2) The purposes of sections 31-1001 to 31-1023 shall be to:

(a) Accelerate the mapping of flood-prone areas;

(b) Assist local governments in the promulgation and implementation of effective flood plain management regulations and other flood plain management practices;

(c) Assure that when state lands are used and state-owned and state-financed facilities are located and constructed, flood hazards are prevented, flood losses are minimized, and the state's eligibility for flood insurance is maintained; and

(d) Encourage local governments with flood-prone areas to qualify for participation in the national flood insurance program.

Laws 1983, LB 35, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 626, § 1.